Hawaii, session 2026, HB1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $99,450,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fortieth representative district, as follows: 1.   Ewa Beach public library, Oahu A.  Plans and design for improvements to the library building, meeting room, and property to expand services and programs; including improvements to the roof, parking lot, entrance, bathrooms, air conditioning, ground and site improvements, energy efficiency, building improvements for efficiency and safety, and other related equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                     $1,500,000 2.   Ilima Intermediate school, Oahu A.  Plans, design, supplies, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for a new building to address area growth, accommodate the addition of sixth grade, and replace older, dilapidated buildings. Plans and design                       $3,400,000 Supplies                               $3,400,000 Construction                           $23,800,000 Equipment                              $1,700,000 Total funding                     $34,000,000 B.  Plans, design, supplies, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for a remodel of building I to support the implementation of workforce development vocational programs. Plans and design                       $700,000 Supplies                               $700,000 Construction                           $4,900,000 Equipment                              $350,000 Other                                  $350,000 Total funding                     $7,000,000 C.  Plans, design, supplies, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for renovation of the student and faculty restrooms in buildings A, C, E, and I to provide safe, modern, and functional facilities. Plans and design                       $250,000 Supplies                               $250,000 Construction                           $1,750,000 Equipment                              $125,000 Other                                  $125,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 D.  Plans, design, supplies, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for a parking structure over the boys and girls club to address critical parking shortages. Plans and design                       $3,700,000 Supplies                               $3,700,000 Construction                           $25,900,000 Equipment                              $1,850,000 Other                                  $1,850,000 Total funding                     $37,000,000 E.  Plans, design, supplies, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for interior safety and security fencing. Plans and design                       $300,000 Supplies                               $300,000 Construction                           $2,100,000 Equipment                              $150,000 Other                                  $150,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 3.   Campbell high school, Oahu A.  Plans, design, supplies, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for a new sports complex. Plans and design                       $700,000 Supplies                               $700,000 Construction                           $4,900,000 Equipment                              $350,000 Other                                  $350,000 Total funding                     $7,000,000 B.  Plans, design, supplies, equipment, and appurtenances to improve ADA program access. Total funding                     $1,300,000 4.   Kaimiloa elementary school, Oahu A.  Plans, design, supplies, equipment, and appurtenances for ADA public accommodations. Total funding                     $900,000 5.   Iroquois Point elementary school, Oahu A.  Plans, design, and construction of a playground cover or awning. Plans                                  $10,000 Design                                 $10,000 Construction                           $100,000 Total funding                     $120,000 B.  Plans, design, and construction to enclose the IPES orchard, garden, and outdoor learning area that is used by students in grades pre-K through sixth, to include a four foot chain link fence, installation of shade for the peace garden, concrete walking path, and a hale. Plans                                  $20,000 Design                                 $20,000 Construction                           $75,000 Total funding                     $115,000 6.   Pohakea elementary school, Oahu Plans, design, and construction of an outdoor performance stage area; ground and site improvements. Plans                                  $500,000 Design                                 $500,000 Construction                           $4,000,000 Total funding                     $5,000,000 SECTION 2. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $35,683,500 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fortieth representative district, as follows: 1.   Highway construction A.  Design and construction for a sidewalk gap on Fort Weaver Road from Geiger Road to Keoneula Boulevard. Design                                     $135,000 Construction                                $682,000 Total funding                          $817,000 B.  Construction for a shared use path on Fort Weaver Road from Kilaha Street to Puuloa Beach Park. Construction                                $866,500 Total funding                          $866,500 C.  Construction for road improvements and extension of Fort Weaver Road from Keaunui Drive to Renton Road. Construction                           $34,000,000 Total funding                     $34,000,000 SECTION 3. The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4. The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 2 shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________